el: Τύπος επένδυσης στο λουράκι αστραγάλου: Με επένδυση EVA; Με επένδυση τζελ; Με επένδυση αφρού μνήμης; Με φόδρα νεοπρενίου; Χωρίς επένδυση; Άλλο
de: Typ der Fesselriemenpolsterung: EVA-gepolstert; Gel-gepolstert; Memory-Foam-gepolstert; Neopren-gefüttert; Ungepolstert; Sonstige
ko: 발목 스트랩 패딩 유형: EVA 패드형; 젤 패드형; 메모리 폼 패드형; 네오프렌 안감; 패드 없음; 기타
ja: アンクルストラップ余白タイプ: EVAパッド入り; ゲルパッド入り; 形状記憶フォームパッド入り; ネオプレン裏地付き; パッドなし; その他
bg-BG: Тип подплънка на каишката за глезен: С EVA подплата; С гел подплата; С подплата от мемори пяна; С неопренова подплата; Без подплата; Друго
cs: Typ polstrování kotníkového pásku: S výplní z EVA; S gelovou výplní; S výplní z paměťové pěny; S neoprenovou vložkou; Bez výplně; Jiné
nb: Ankelstropp utfyllingstype: EVA-polstret; Gel-polstret; Minneskum-polstret; Neoprenfôret; Upolstret; Annet
zh-TW: 腳踝綁帶襯墊類型: EVA 緩衝墊; 凝膠緩衝墊; 記憶海綿緩衝墊; 氯丁橡膠內襯; 無緩衝墊; 其他
hu: Bokapánt margó típusú: EVA habszivacsos; Gélpárnás; Memóriahabos; Neoprén béléses; Párnázatlan; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ polstrovania členkového popruhu: S výstelkou EVA; S gélovou výstelkou; S výstelkou z pamäťovej peny; Podšité neoprénom; Bez výstelky; Iný
pl: Typ wyściółki paska kostki: Z pianką EVA; Wypełnienie żelowe; Z pianką memory; Z podszewką neoprenową; Bez wypełnienia; Inny
vi: Loại đệm dây đeo mắt cá chân: Lót EVA; Lót gel; Lót mút xốp ghi nhớ; Lót neoprene; Không đệm lót; Khác
da: Ankelrems udfyldningstype: EVA-polstret; Gelpolstret; Polstret med memoryskum; Foret med neopren; Upolstret; Andet
en: Ankle strap padding type: EVA padded; Gel padded; Memory foam padded; Neoprene lined; Unpadded; Other
lt-LT: Kulkšnies dirželio paminkštinimo tipas: Su EVA paminkštinimu; Su gelio paminkštinimu; Su „Memory“ putų paminkštinimu; Su neopreno pamušalu; Be paminkštinimo; Kita
tr: Ayak bileği kayışı dolgu tipi: EVA dolgulu; Jel dolgulu; Akıllı sünger dolgulu; Neopren astarlı; Dolgusuz; Diğer
nl: Type vulling enkelband: Met EVA-vulling; Met gelvulling; Met traagschuimvulling; Met neopreenvoering; Zonder vulling; Overig
th: ประเภทวัสดุรองรับแรงกระแทกของสายรัดข้อเท้า: บุด้วย EVA; บุด้วยเจล; บุด้วยเมมโมรี่โฟม; ซับด้วยยางนีโอพรีน; ไม่บุ; อื่นๆ
it: Cinturino alla caviglia tipo spaziatura interna: Con imbottitura in EVA; Con imbottitura in gel; Con imbottitura in memory foam; Con rivestimento in neoprene; Non imbottito; Altro
ro-RO: Tip de căptușeală curea pentru glezne: Căptușit cu EVA; Căptușit cu gel; Căptușit cu spumă cu memorie; Căptușit cu neopren; Necăptușit; Altele
sl-SI: Tip oblazinjenja trakca okoli gležnja: Oblazinjenje EVA; Oblazinjenje z gelom; Oblazinjenje s spominsko peno; Podloga iz neoprena; Brez oblazinjenja; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo preenchimento/acolchoamento da tira do tornozelo: Acolchoado com EVA; Acolchoado com gel; Acolchoado com espuma de memória; Forrado com neoprene; Sem acolchoamento; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de preenchimento da correia do tornozelo: Acolchoado com EVA; Acolchoado com gel; Acolchoado com espuma viscoelástica; Revestido a neopreno; Sem acolchoamento; Outro
ru: Тип набивки ремешка на щиколотке: С подкладкой из EVA; С гелевой подкладкой; С подкладкой из пены с эффектом памяти; С неопреновой подкладкой; Без подкладки; Другое
fr: Type de rembourrage de la sangle de cheville: Rembourrage en EVA; Rembourrage en gel; Rembourrage en mousse à mémoire de forme; Doublé de néoprène; Non rembourré; Autre
fi: Nilkkahihnan toppaustyyppi: EVA-pehmustettu; Geelipehmustettu; Muistivaahtopehmustettu; Neopreenivuorattu; Pehmustamaton; Muu
sv: Fotledsremmens fodertyp: EVA-vadderad; Gelvadderad; Vadderad med minnesskum; Neoprenfodrad; Ovadderad; Annan
hr-HR: Vrsta podstave remena za gležanj: Podstavljeno EVA pjenom; Podstavljeno gelom; Podstavljeno memorijskom pjenom; Obloženo neoprenom; Bez podstave; Ostalo
es: Tipo de relleno de la correa del tobillo: Acolchado de EVA; Acolchado de gel; Acolchado de espuma viscoelástica; Forrado de neopreno; Sin acolchado; Otro
zh-CN: 脚踝带衬垫类型: EVA 垫衬; 凝胶垫衬; 记忆棉垫衬; 氯丁橡胶衬里; 无垫衬; 其他